Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4307
City of the primary or metropolitan class; annual report.

On or before December 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, each city of the primary class and city of the metropolitan class shall make a report listing the number of untested sexual assault evidence collection kits for such city. The report shall contain aggregate data only and shall not contain any personal identifying information. The report shall be made publicly available on the city's website and shall be electronically submitted to the Attorney General and to the Legislature.

Laws 2020, LB881, § 1.